Utah statutes.
78B-14-609 (Superseded 07/01/13).   Procedure to register child support order of another state for modification.

A party or support enforcement agency seeking to modify, or to modify and enforce, a child support order issued in another state shall register that order in this state in the same manner provided in Sections 78B-14-601, 78B-14-602, 78B-14-603, and 78B-14-604 if the order has not been registered.  A petition for modification may be filed at the same time as a request for registration, or later.  The pleading must specify the grounds for modification.

